testing/sje-tests.yaml
  Noun - grássebáhkko: # Even syll
    grássebáhkko+N+Sg+Gen: grássebáhkko

  Noun - guabbla: # Even syll
    guabbla+N+Sg+Gen: guabla

  Noun - guarrba: # Even syll
    guarrba+N+Sg+Gen: guarba

  Noun - gukkte: # Even syll
    gukkte+N+Sg+Gen: gukte

  Noun - gummo: # Even syll
    gummo+N+Sg+Gen: gummo

  Noun - gummpi: # Even syll
    gummpi+N+Sg+Gen: gumpi

  Noun - guobbla: # Even syll
    guobbla+N+Sg+Gen: guobla

  Noun - guollbe: # Even syll
    guollbe+N+Sg+Gen: guolbe

  Noun - guolle: # Even syll
    guolle+N+Sg+Gen: guole

  Noun - guorrba: # Even syll
    guorrba+N+Sg+Gen: guorba

  Noun - guosmak: # Even syll
    guosmak+N+Sg+Gen: guosmak

  Noun - gurbma: # Even syll
    gurbma+N+Sg+Gen: gurma

  Noun - gurbmá: # Even syll
    gurbmá+N+Sg+Gen: gurmá

  Noun - gurmmá: # Even syll
    gurmmá+N+Sg+Gen: gurmmá

  Noun - gurrte: # Even syll
    gurrte+N+Sg+Gen: gurte

  Noun - gusamällke: # Even syll
    gusamällke+N+Sg+Gen: gusamälke

  Noun - gussa: # Even syll
    gussa+N+Sg+Gen: gusa

  Noun - gájjse: # Even syll
    gájjse+N+Sg+Gen: gájse

  Noun - gájjtsa: # Even syll
    gájjtsa+N+Sg+Gen: gájjtsa

  Noun - gámmsa: # Even syll
    gámmsa+N+Sg+Gen: gámsa

  Noun - gárrde: # Even syll
    gárrde+N+Sg+Gen: gárde

  Noun - gárrtsa: # Even syll
    gárrtsa+N+Sg+Gen: gárrtsa

  Noun - gäbdne: # Even syll
    gäbdne+N+Sg+Gen: gäbdne

  Noun - gädde: # Even syll
    gädde+N+Sg+Gen: gädde

  Noun - gähtto: # Even syll
    gähtto+N+Sg+Gen: gähttoXXXXXXXX

  Noun - gäjdno: # Even syll
    gäjdno+N+Sg+Gen: gäjdno

  Noun - gärrge: # Even syll
    gärrge+N+Sg+Gen: gärge

  Noun - gärrgelahpa: # Even syll
    gärrgelahpa+N+Sg+Gen: gärrgelaba

  Noun - gättke: # Even syll
    gättke+N+Sg+Gen: gättkeXXXXXXXX

  Noun - gåhte: # Even syll
    gåhte+N+Sg+Gen: gåde

  Noun - gålbmå: # Even syll
    gålbmå+N+Sg+Gen: gålmå

  Noun - gållse: # Even syll
    gållse+N+Sg+Gen: gålse

  Noun - gårdne: # Even syll
    gårdne+N+Sg+Gen: gårdne

  Noun - gårnne: # Even syll
    gårnne+N+Sg+Gen: gårnne

  Noun - gårrså: # Even syll
    gårrså+N+Sg+Gen: gårså

  Noun - gårrtje: # Even syll
    gårrtje+N+Sg+Gen: gårrtje

  Noun - gåvdnje: # Even syll
    gåvdnje+N+Sg+Gen: gåvdnje

  Noun - happsa: # Even syll
    happsa+N+Sg+Gen: hapsa

  Noun - huvvsa: # Even syll
    huvvsa+N+Sg+Gen: huvvsa

  Noun - hábres: # Even syll
    hábres+N+Sg+Gen: hábres

  Noun - hägga: # Even syll
    hägga+N+Sg+Gen: hägga

  Noun - hälbme: # Even syll
    hälbme+N+Sg+Gen: hälme

  Noun - härra: # Even syll
    härra+N+Sg+Gen: hära

  Noun - härrge: # Even syll
    härrge+N+Sg+Gen: härge

  Noun - härrá: # Even syll
    härrá+N+Sg+Gen: härá

  Noun - idja: # Even syll
    idja+N+Sg+Gen: ija

  Noun - iello: # Even syll
    iello+N+Sg+Gen: ielo

  Noun - ijja: # Even syll
    ijja+N+Sg+Gen: ija

  Noun - jahke: # Even syll
    jahke+N+Sg+Gen: jage

  Noun - jiegŋa: # Even syll
    jiegŋa+N+Sg+Gen: jiegŋa

  Noun - juovva: # Even syll
    juovva+N+Sg+Gen: juova

  Noun - juällke: # Even syll
    juällke+N+Sg+Gen: juälke

  Noun - jávvre: # Even syll
    jávvre+N+Sg+Gen: jávre

  Noun - jávvrelådde: # Even syll
    jávvrelådde+N+Sg+Gen: jávvrelådde

  Noun - jåhkå: # Even syll
    jåhkå+N+Sg+Gen: jågå

  Noun - jåhkågádde: # Even syll
    jåhkågádde+N+Sg+Gen: jåhkågádde

  Noun - jårrbodahka: # Even syll
    jårrbodahka+N+Sg+Gen: jårrbodaga

  Noun - kaffa: # Even syll
    kaffa+N+Sg+Gen: kafa

  Noun - kammba: # Even syll
    kammba+N+Sg+Gen: kamba

  Noun - klåhkkár: # Even syll
    klåhkkár+N+Sg+Gen: klåhkkára

  Noun - kujdna: # Even syll
    kujdna+N+Sg+Gen: kujdna

  Noun - káffa: # Even syll
    káffa+N+Sg+Gen: káffa

  Noun - kånnsta: # Even syll
    kånnsta+N+Sg+Gen: kånnsta

  Noun - lassta: # Even syll
    lassta+N+Sg+Gen: lasta

  Noun - liddja: # Even syll
    liddja+N+Sg+Gen: liddjaXXXXXXXX

  Noun - lihtte: # Even syll
    lihtte+N+Sg+Gen: lihtteXXXXXXXX

  Noun - livva: # Even syll
    livva+N+Sg+Gen: liva

  Noun - luadda: # Even syll
    luadda+N+Sg+Gen: luadda

  Noun - luakkta: # Even syll
    luakkta+N+Sg+Gen: luakta

  Noun - luhpe: # Even syll
    luhpe+N+Sg+Gen: lube

  Noun - luodda: # Even syll
    luodda+N+Sg+Gen: luodda

  Noun - luovve: # Even syll
    luovve+N+Sg+Gen: luove

  Noun - luoŋŋa: # Even syll
    luoŋŋa+N+Sg+Gen: luoŋŋa

  Noun - lusspe: # Even syll
    lusspe+N+Sg+Gen: luspe

  Noun - luäppte: # Even syll
    luäppte+N+Sg+Gen: luäpte

  Noun - lábbtje: # Even syll
    lábbtje+N+Sg+Gen: lábbtje

  Noun - lábbtje: # Even syll
    lábbtje+N+Sg+Gen: lábbtje

  Noun - lábbtje: # Even syll
    lábbtje+N+Sg+Gen: lábtje

  Noun - lábbtje: # Even syll
    lábbtje+N+Sg+Gen: lábtje

  Noun - lájjbe: # Even syll
    lájjbe+N+Sg+Gen: lájbe

  Noun - lánnda: # Even syll
    lánnda+N+Sg+Gen: lánda

  Noun - lássta: # Even syll
    lássta+N+Sg+Gen: lásta

  Noun - lávvlomvärrsa: # Even syll
    lávvlomvärrsa+N+Sg+Gen: lávvlomvärsa

  Noun - länjggá: # Even syll
    länjggá+N+Sg+Gen: länjggá

  Noun - lännska: # Even syll
    lännska+N+Sg+Gen: lännska

  Noun - lådde: # Even syll
    lådde+N+Sg+Gen: lådde

  Noun - lånestiejje: # Even syll
    lånestiejje+N+Sg+Gen: lånestieje

  Noun - låpptå: # Even syll
    låpptå+N+Sg+Gen: låptå

  Noun - mannje: # Even syll
    mannje+N+Sg+Gen: manje

  Noun - muorra: # Even syll
    muorra+N+Sg+Gen: muora

  Noun - muvvra: # Even syll
    muvvra+N+Sg+Gen: muvra

  Noun - máles: # Even syll
    máles+N+Sg+Gen: mállása

  Noun - mánno: # Even syll
    mánno+N+Sg+Gen: máno

  Noun - mánná: # Even syll
    mánná+N+Sg+Gen: máná

  Noun - mánnábálle: # Even syll
    mánnábálle+N+Sg+Gen: mánnábále

  Noun - mällke: # Even syll
    mällke+N+Sg+Gen: mälke

  Noun - måhkke: # Even syll
    måhkke+N+Sg+Gen: måhkke

  Noun - mårrse: # Even syll
    mårrse+N+Sg+Gen: mårse

  Noun - namma: # Even syll
    namma+N+Sg+Gen: nama

  Noun - namma: # Even syll
    namma+N+Sg+Gen: nama

  Noun - nieđđa: # Even syll
    nieđđa+N+Sg+Gen: nieđđa

  Noun - nijjbe: # Even syll
    nijjbe+N+Sg+Gen: nijbe

  Noun - njalla: # Even syll
    njalla+N+Sg+Gen: njala

  Noun - njidtje: # Even syll
    njidtje+N+Sg+Gen: njidtje

  Noun - njisskat: # Even syll
    njisskat+N+Sg+Gen: njisskata

  Noun - nuohtte: # Even syll
    nuohtte+N+Sg+Gen: nuohtteXXXXXXXX

  Noun - náhkke: # Even syll
    náhkke+N+Sg+Gen: náhkke

  Noun - náhppe: # Even syll
    náhppe+N+Sg+Gen: náhppe

  Noun - námme: # Even syll
    námme+N+Sg+Gen: náme

  Noun - násste: # Even syll
    násste+N+Sg+Gen: náste

  Noun - näggda: # Even syll
    näggda+N+Sg+Gen: nägda

  Noun - näjjda: # Even syll
    näjjda+N+Sg+Gen: näjda

  Noun - nåjjde: # Even syll
    nåjjde+N+Sg+Gen: nåjde

  Noun - påvvstå: # Even syll
    påvvstå+N+Sg+Gen: påvvstå

  Noun - rabbda: # Even syll
    rabbda+N+Sg+Gen: rabda

  Noun - ragátmánno: # Even syll
    ragátmánno+N+Sg+Gen: ragátmáno

  Noun - ragátájjge: # Even syll
    ragátájjge+N+Sg+Gen: ragátájge

  Noun - rassta: # Even syll
    rassta+N+Sg+Gen: rasta

  Noun - rebij: # Even syll
    rebij+N+Sg+Gen: rephiha

  Noun - riemmste: # Even syll
    riemmste+N+Sg+Gen: riemmste

  Noun - riessjme: # Even syll
    riessjme+N+Sg+Gen: riessjme

  Noun - rijjka: # Even syll
    rijjka+N+Sg+Gen: rijka

  Noun - rimmste: # Even syll
    rimmste+N+Sg+Gen: rimmste

  Noun - rissja: # Even syll
    rissja+N+Sg+Gen: risja

  Noun - roanntjo: # Even syll
    roanntjo+N+Sg+Gen: roanntjo

  Noun - roavvgo: # Even syll
    roavvgo+N+Sg+Gen: roavgo

  Noun - ruävvde: # Even syll
    ruävvde+N+Sg+Gen: ruävde

  Noun - rádje: # Even syll
    rádje+N+Sg+Gen: ráje

  Noun - rádna: # Even syll
    rádna+N+Sg+Gen: rána

  Noun - ráffe: # Even syll
    ráffe+N+Sg+Gen: ráfe

  Noun - rájje: # Even syll
    rájje+N+Sg+Gen: ráje

  Noun - rássjo: # Even syll
    rássjo+N+Sg+Gen: rásjo

  Noun - rávdno: # Even syll
    rávdno+N+Sg+Gen: rávdno

  Noun - rávnno: # Even syll
    rávnno+N+Sg+Gen: rávnno

  Noun - rávve: # Even syll
    rávve+N+Sg+Gen: ráve

  Noun - räjjdo: # Even syll
    räjjdo+N+Sg+Gen: räjdo

  Noun - rännta: # Even syll
    rännta+N+Sg+Gen: ränta

  Noun - rässjme: # Even syll
    rässjme+N+Sg+Gen: rässjme

  Noun - rågge: # Even syll
    rågge+N+Sg+Gen: rågge

  Noun - råhttje: # Even syll
    råhttje+N+Sg+Gen: råhtje

  Noun - råhttje: # Even syll
    råhttje+N+Sg+Gen: råhtje

  Noun - råhttje: # Even syll
    råhttje+N+Sg+Gen: råhtje

  Noun - råhttje: # Even syll
    råhttje+N+Sg+Gen: råhtje

  Noun - rånttjo: # Even syll
    rånttjo+N+Sg+Gen: rånttjoXXXXXXXX

  Noun - råvvgo: # Even syll
    råvvgo+N+Sg+Gen: råvgo

  Noun - sajje: # Even syll
    sajje+N+Sg+Gen: saje

  Noun - sarves: # Even syll
    sarves+N+Sg+Gen: sarvesá

  Noun - sassne: # Even syll
    sassne+N+Sg+Gen: sasne

  Noun - savvtsa: # Even syll
    savvtsa+N+Sg+Gen: savvtsa

  Noun - savvun: # Even syll
    savvun+N+Sg+Gen: savvuna

  Noun - sievalådde: # Even syll
    sievalådde+N+Sg+Gen: sievalådde

  Noun - sijjda: # Even syll
    sijjda+N+Sg+Gen: sijda

  Noun - sillba: # Even syll
    sillba+N+Sg+Gen: silba

  Noun - sivvun: # Even syll
    sivvun+N+Sg+Gen: sivvuna

  Noun - skuojjve: # Even syll
    skuojjve+N+Sg+Gen: skuojve

  Noun - skuvvle: # Even syll
    skuvvle+N+Sg+Gen: skuvle

  Noun - skájjde: # Even syll
    skájjde+N+Sg+Gen: skájde

  Noun - skäŋŋga: # Even syll
    skäŋŋga+N+Sg+Gen: skäŋga

  Noun - skåvvlå: # Even syll
    skåvvlå+N+Sg+Gen: skåvlå

  Noun - stummpa: # Even syll
    stummpa+N+Sg+Gen: stumpa

  Noun - stuvvsa: # Even syll
    stuvvsa+N+Sg+Gen: stuvvsa

  Noun - stállo: # Even syll
    stállo+N+Sg+Gen: stálo

  Noun - stállpe: # Even syll
    stállpe+N+Sg+Gen: stálpe

  Noun - stárrfo: # Even syll
    stárrfo+N+Sg+Gen: stárfo

  Noun - stáđđa: # Even syll
    stáđđa+N+Sg+Gen: stáđđa

  Noun - stänntjo: # Even syll
    stänntjo+N+Sg+Gen: stänntjo

  Noun - ståhpo: # Even syll
    ståhpo+N+Sg+Gen: ståbo

  Noun - suokkno: # Even syll
    suokkno+N+Sg+Gen: suokkno

  Noun - suoŋŋer: # Even syll
    suoŋŋer+N+Sg+Gen: suoŋŋera

  Noun - suptsas: # Even syll
    suptsas+N+Sg+Gen: suptsasa

  Noun - suäjdne: # Even syll
    suäjdne+N+Sg+Gen: suäjdne

  Noun - suäŋŋer: # Even syll
    suäŋŋer+N+Sg+Gen: suäŋŋera

  Noun - svallfo: # Even syll
    svallfo+N+Sg+Gen: svalfo

  Noun - sválltja: # Even syll
    sválltja+N+Sg+Gen: sválltja

  Noun - sábme: # Even syll
    sábme+N+Sg+Gen: sáme

  Noun - sáffta: # Even syll
    sáffta+N+Sg+Gen: sáfta

  Noun - sálbmavärrsa: # Even syll
    sálbmavärrsa+N+Sg+Gen: sálbmavärsa

  Noun - sállte: # Even syll
    sállte+N+Sg+Gen: sálte

  Noun - sámesijjda: # Even syll
    sámesijjda+N+Sg+Gen: sámesijda

  Noun - sávvtsa: # Even syll
    sávvtsa+N+Sg+Gen: sávvtsa

  Noun - säjjbe: # Even syll
    säjjbe+N+Sg+Gen: säjbe

  Noun - såhkevuobme: # Even syll
    såhkevuobme+N+Sg+Gen: såhkevuome

  Noun - tea: # Even syll
    tea+N+Sg+Gen: tea

  Noun - tjakktja: # Even syll
    tjakktja+N+Sg+Gen: tjakktja

  Noun - tjarrva: # Even syll
    tjarrva+N+Sg+Gen: tjarva

  Noun - tjiektja: # Even syll
    tjiektja+N+Sg+Gen: tjiektja

  Noun - tjuavvtja: # Even syll
    tjuavvtja+N+Sg+Gen: tjuavvtja

  Noun - tjukktje: # Even syll
    tjukktje+N+Sg+Gen: tjukktje

  Noun - tjuvvde: # Even syll
    tjuvvde+N+Sg+Gen: tjuvde

  Noun - tjáhtje: # Even syll
    tjáhtje+N+Sg+Gen: tjáhtje

  Noun - tjáhtse: # Even syll
    tjáhtse+N+Sg+Gen: tjátse

  Noun - tjäkktja: # Even syll
    tjäkktja+N+Sg+Gen: tjäkktja

  Noun - tjännsta: # Even syll
    tjännsta+N+Sg+Gen: tjännsta

  Noun - tjänntá: # Even syll
    tjänntá+N+Sg+Gen: tjäntá

  Noun - tjårrve: # Even syll
    tjårrve+N+Sg+Gen: tjårve

  Noun - tsuabbtsa: # Even syll
    tsuabbtsa+N+Sg+Gen: tsuabbtsa

  Noun - tsuapptsa: # Even syll
    tsuapptsa+N+Sg+Gen: tsuapptsa

  Noun - ukksa: # Even syll
    ukksa+N+Sg+Gen: uksa

  Noun - vanas: # Even syll
    vanas+N+Sg+Gen: vatnasa

  Noun - vanntsa: # Even syll
    vanntsa+N+Sg+Gen: vanntsa

  Noun - vassje: # Even syll
    vassje+N+Sg+Gen: vasje
